src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_verbs.lexc
LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_n_Prefix=NI_Order=Ind_Endings
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Dub+ExclSubj:ziiminaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Neu+ExclSubj:ziimin EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Prt+ExclSubj:ziiminaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Dub+ExclSubj:iminaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Neu+ExclSubj:imin EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj:iminaaban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_am                                     !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Boundary
0:%>%> VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_am                                     !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Flags
@R.Prefix.GI@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_am                                     !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Cnj@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings ;
@U.Order.Ind@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings ;
@U.Order.Other@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_am, Prefix: NONE, Order: Cnj           !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2PlSubj:anziiwegwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObvSubj:anziinigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProxSubj:anziiwaagwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Dub+ExclSubj:anziiwaangen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Dub+InclSubj:anziiwangen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2PlSubj:amowegibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObvSubj:aminigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj:amowaagobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+ExclSubj:amowaangibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+InclSubj:amowangibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2PlSubj:anziweg EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObvSubj:anzinid EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObvSubj:anzinig EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProxSubj:anzigwaa EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Neu+ExclSubj:anziwaang EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Neu+InclSubj:anziwang EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2PlSubj:anziwegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObvSubj:anzinigoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProxSubj:anzigwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Prt+ExclSubj:anziwaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Neg+Prt+InclSubj:anziwangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2PlSubj:amowegwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObvSubj:aminigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProxSubj:amowaagwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Dub+ExclSubj:amowaangen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Dub+InclSubj:amowangen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2PlSubj:amowegibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObvSubj:aminigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj:amowaagobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+ExclSubj:amowaangibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+InclSubj:amowangibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2PlSubj:ameg EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObvSubj:aminid EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProxSubj:amowaad EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Neu+ExclSubj:amaang EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Neu+InclSubj:amang EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj:amegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj:amegoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj:aminipan EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj:amowaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj:amaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj:amangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj:amangoban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_am                                     !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=GI                                          !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Flags_Prefix=GI
@U.Order.Ind@ VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Prefix=GI_Order=Ind_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_am, Prefix: GI, Order: Ind             !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Prefix=GI_Order=Ind_Endings
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Dub+2PlSubj:anziimwaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Dub+InclSubj:anziiminaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Neu+2PlSubj:anziim EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Neu+InclSubj:anziimin EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Prt+2PlSubj:anziimwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Neg+Prt+InclSubj:anziiminaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Dub+2PlSubj:aamwaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Dub+InclSubj:aaminaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Neu+2PlSubj:aam EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Neu+InclSubj:aamin EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj:aamwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIPL+Ind+Pos+Prt+InclSubj:aaminaaban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIPL, Class: VAIPL_am, Prefix: NONE, Order: Ind           !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIPL_Stems
animakwa'amoog:animakwa'= VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Boundary ;
baashkikwe'amoog:baashkikwe' VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Boundary ;
baatayiinwewidamoog:baatayiinwewid VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Boundary ;
biidakwa'amoog:biidakwa' VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Boundary ;
jiingwewidamoog:jiingwewid VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Boundary ;
naanookamoog:naanook VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Boundary ;
niiwookamoog:niiwook VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Boundary ;
nisookamoog:nisook VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Boundary ;
ojaanimakwa'amoog:ojaanimakwa' VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Boundary ;
waasamoog:waas VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Boundary ;
waawaasamoog:waawaas VAIPL_Class=VAIPL_am_Boundary ;
